Montana, session 2025, HB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Digital mapping -- requirements. All persons and entities maintaining
digital maps of the state for electronic distribution shall update their maps in accordance with the digital map
maintained by the state library by August 1, 2025, and then within 30 days of the annual state library update of
the map afterward. Digital maps for electronic distribution must denominate and graphically mark previous
historical locations no longer occupied by navigable rivers as: "Private land surface owned by adjacent
landowner. Permission required."

Section 2. Section 23-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-2-302. Recreational use permitted -- limitations -- exceptions. (1) Except as provided in
subsections (2) through (5) (8), all surface waters that are capable of recreational use may be so used by the
public without regard to the ownership of the land underlying the waters.
(2) The right of the public to make recreational use of surface waters does not include, without
permission or contractual arrangement with the landowner:
(a) the operation of all-terrain vehicles or other motorized vehicles not primarily designed for
operation upon the water;
(b) the recreational use of surface waters in a stock pond or other private impoundment fed by an
intermittently flowing natural watercourse;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 240

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 240.1
(c) the recreational use of waters while diverted away from a natural water body for beneficial use
pursuant to Title 85, chapter 2, part 2 or 3, except for impoundments or diverted waters to which the owner has
provided public access;
(d) big game hunting;
(e) overnight camping unless it is necessary for the enjoyment of the surface water and the
campsite is not within sight of any occupied dwelling or the campsite is more than 500 yards from any occupied
dwelling, whichever is less;
(f) the placement or creation of any permanent duck blind, boat moorage, or any other permanent
object;
(g) the placement or creation of any seasonal object, such as a duck blind or boat moorage,
unless necessary for the enjoyment of that particular surface water and unless the seasonal objects are placed
out of sight of any occupied dwelling or more than 500 yards from any occupied dwelling, whichever is less;
(h) use of a streambed as a right-of-way for any purpose when water is not flowing in the
streambed.
(3) The right of the public to make recreational use of class II waters does not include, without
permission of the landowner:
(a) big game hunting;
(b) overnight camping;
(c) the placement or creation of any seasonal object; or
(d) other activities that are not primarily water-related pleasure activities as defined in 23-2-
301(10).
(4) The right of the public to make recreational use of surface waters does not grant any easement
or right to the public to enter onto or cross private property in order to use those waters for recreational
purposes.
(5) The right of the public to make recreational use of surface waters does not include the right to
fire a shotgun or rifle from watercraft on navigable rivers or across navigable rivers from the banks for the
purposes of harvesting big game or hunting wildlife other than migratory game birds by means of a shotgun.
(6) The right of the public to make recreational use of surface waters does not include the right to
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 240

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 240.1
use the surface waters for access to islands or former islands owned, or claimed to be owned, by the state to
hunt for animals other than waterfowl, except by means of a bow or crossbow, unless otherwise specifically
permitted under rules adopted by the commission.
(5)(7) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to 87-1-303, in the interest of public health, public
safety, or the protection of public and private property, governing recreational use of class I and class II waters.
These rules must include the following:
(a) the establishment of procedures by which any person may request an order from the
commission:
(i) limiting, restricting, or prohibiting the type, incidence, or extent of recreational use of a surface
water; or
(ii) altering limitations, restrictions, or prohibitions on recreational use of a surface water imposed
by the commission;
(b) provisions requiring the issuance of written findings and a decision whenever a request is
made pursuant to the rules adopted under subsection (5)(a) (7)(a); and
(c) a procedure for the identification of streams within class II waters that are not capable of
recreational use or are capable of limited recreational use, and a procedure to restrict the recreational use to
the actual capacity of the water.
(6)(8) The provisions of this section do not affect any rights of the public with respect to state-owned
lands that are school trust lands or any rights of lessees of those lands."

Section 3. Section 90-1-404, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-1-404. Geospatial information -- management -- duties of state library. (1) The state library
shall:
(a) serve as the administrator of the account;
(b) work with all stakeholders, including but not limited to federal, state, local, private, and tribal
entities, to prioritize needs and collect, develop, maintain, and disseminate geographic information systems,
geospatial information, and geospatial technologies;
(c) in cooperation with the department of natural resources and conservation, update its statewide
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 240

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 240.1
global information system map to reflect the current locations of navigable rivers and to denominate and
graphically mark previous historical locations no longer occupied by navigable rivers as: "Private land surface
owned by adjacent landowner. Permission required." The update must be done within 30 days of receiving the
data from the department of natural resources and conservation. The department of natural resources and
conservation shall provide the most recent mapping of the navigable rivers of the state by June 1, 2025, and by
January 1 of each following year.
(c)(d) prepare a geospatial information plan and operate according to the provisions of the plan. The
plan:
(i) must be created in consultation with the council;
(ii) may include but is not limited to:
(A) the prioritized needs to collect, maintain, and disseminate geospatial information;
(B) priorities for geospatial coordination; and
(C) priorities for grant awards; and
(iii) must be reviewed and, if appropriate, updated every 3 years.
(d)(e) establish an application process and a granting process that must be used to distribute funds in
the account;
(e)(f) review all grant applications;
(f)(g) consider grant recommendations by the council;
(g)(h) monitor a recipient's use of grant funds to ensure that the use of the funds complies with the
purposes of this part;
(h)(i) coordinate the development of standards for geographic information systems, geospatial
information, and geospatial technologies;
(i)(j) serve as the primary point of contact for national, regional, state, and other GIS coordinating
groups for the purpose of channeling issues and projects to the appropriate individual, organization, agency, or
other entity;
(j)(k) provide administrative and staff support to the council, including paying the expenses of the
council;
(k)(l) annually prepare a budget to carry out the state library's responsibilities described in this
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 240

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 240.1
section; and
(l)(m) implement the conservation easement information requirements as provided for in 76-6-212.
(2) To fulfill the responsibilities described in subsection (1), the state library or any recipient of
funds granted pursuant to this part may contract with a public or private entity."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 240